Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2409.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5102SV (2) 91 th/ns S.F. 2409 Section 1. Section 321.34, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 11E. Gadsden flag plates. 3 a. Upon application and payment of the proper fees, the 4 director may issue Gadsden flag plates to the owner of a 5 motor vehicle subject to registration under section 321.109, 6 subsection 1, autocycle, motor truck, motor home, multipurpose 7 vehicle, motorcycle, trailer, or travel trailer. 8 b. Gadsden flag plates shall be designed by the department. 9 The background shall be black and the plateâs numbers and 10 letters shall be yellow. The left side of the plate shall 11 depict a yellow rattlesnake coiled on grass. The image 12 depicting the coiled rattlesnake shall be at least three inches 13 tall and two inches wide. The phrase âDonât Tread on Meâ shall 14 appear at the bottom of the plate. 15 c. The special Gadsden flag fee for letter-number designated 16 Gadsden flag plates is fifty dollars. An applicant may obtain 17 personalized Gadsden flag plates upon payment of the fee for 18 personalized plates as provided in subsection 5, which is in 19 addition to the special Gadsden flag fee. Personalized plates 20 authorized by this subsection shall be limited to no more 21 than five numerals, letters, or combinations of numerals and 22 letters. 23 d. (1) The fees collected by the director under this 24 subsection shall be paid monthly to the treasurer of state and 25 deposited in the road use tax fund. 26 (2) The treasurer of state shall transfer monthly from 27 the statutory allocations fund created under section 321.145, 28 subsection 2, to the general fund of the state the amount of 29 the special fees collected in the previous month for Gadsden 30 flag plates. Such moneys are appropriated as follows: 31 (a) Fifty percent is appropriated to the natural resource 32 commission to distribute in the form of shooting sports 33 development grants to applicants for the creation of new 34 shooting ranges and improvement of existing shooting ranges 35 -1- LSB 5102SV (2) 91 th/ns 1/ 5 S.F. 2409 and facilities. The natural resource commission shall not 1 award a grant to an applicant unless the applicant allows 2 students enrolled at a public or private school to participate 3 in shooting sports at the applicantâs range or facility. The 4 natural resource commission shall give first consideration 5 to any applicant who has agreed to allow a public or private 6 school sports shooting team to use the applicantâs range 7 or facility. The natural resource commission shall adopt 8 rules pursuant to chapter 17A to administer this subparagraph 9 division. 10 (b) Fifty percent is appropriated to the department of 11 homeland security and emergency management to distribute in 12 the form of grants to school districts to be used for school 13 infrastructure described in section 423F.3, subsection 6, 14 paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (4) or (5). The department of 15 homeland security and emergency management shall adopt rules 16 pursuant to chapter 17A to administer this subparagraph 17 division. 18 (3) Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated under 19 subparagraph (2) shall not revert to the general fund of the 20 state. 21 e. Upon receipt of the special registration plates, the 22 applicant shall surrender the current registration plates to 23 the county treasurer. The county treasurer shall validate 24 the special registration plates in the same manner as regular 25 registration plates are validated under this section. The 26 annual special Gadsden flag fee for letter-number designated 27 plates is fifty dollars which shall be paid in addition to 28 the regular annual registration fee. The annual fee for 29 personalized Gadsden flag plates is five dollars which shall be 30 paid in addition to the annual special Gadsden flag fee and the 31 regular annual registration fee. The annual special Gadsden 32 flag fee shall be credited as provided under paragraph âdâ . 33 f. The department shall not condition the issuance of 34 Gadsden flag plates on the receipt of any number of orders for 35 -2- LSB 5102SV (2) 91 th/ns 2/ 5 S.F. 2409 Gadsden flag plates. 1 Sec. 2. Section 321.166, subsections 2 and 9, Code 2026, are 2 amended to read as follows: 3 2. Every registration plate or pair of plates shall display 4 a registration plate number which shall consist of alphabetical 5 or numerical characters or a combination thereof and the name 6 of this state, which may be abbreviated. Every registration 7 plate issued by the county treasurer shall display the name 8 of the county, including any plate issued pursuant to section 9 321.34 , except Pearl Harbor and purple heart registration 10 plates issued prior to January 1, 1997; and collegiate, fire 11 fighter, and medal of honor , and Gadsden flag registration 12 plates. Special truck registration plates shall display the 13 word âspecialâ. The department may adopt rules to implement 14 this subsection . 15 9. Special registration plates issued pursuant to section 16 321.34 , other than gold star, medal of honor, collegiate, fire 17 fighter, natural resources, blackout, and flying our colors , 18 and Gadsden flag registration plates, shall be consistent with 19 the design and color of regular registration plates but shall 20 provide a space on a portion of the plate for the purpose of 21 allowing the placement of a distinguishing processed emblem or 22 an organization decal. Special registration plates shall also 23 comply with the requirements for regular registration plates 24 as provided in this section to the extent the requirements are 25 consistent with the section authorizing a particular special 26 vehicle registration plate. 27